North Dakota, session 69, HB1359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 26.1-40 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Preferred repair shop - Prohibited.
1. An insurance company may not recommend, give preference, or give incentives to a
specific repair shop or chain of repair shops for the repair of automobiles covered by
the insurance company.
2. An insurance company may assign an adjuster to evaluate the damage to the
automobile and make an offer to the insured. If the insured disagrees with the offer,
the insured may submit an estimate from a repair shop of the insured's choosing to
justify the insured's claim the insurance offer should be higher.
Page No. 1 25.0995.03000